Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.574

Stadium world cup capital account—Loans for capital improvements for 2026 world cup.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

(1) The legislature recognizes the honor of Seattle being chosen as a host city for the 2026 FIFA World Cup soccer competition. The matches will attract hundreds of thousands of fans to our region and bring unprecedented attention to Seattle and the state of Washington as a whole. In recognition of the economic benefit to the state, the legislature intends to provide assistance in making the capital improvements necessary to host this event.

(2) The stadium world cup capital account is created in the state treasury for the purpose of advancing moneys to the Washington state public stadium authority for capital improvements required to host the 2026 World Cup. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(3) The department of commerce must enter into a loan agreement with the Washington state public stadium authority to advance funds for capital improvements necessary to host the 2026 World Cup. The department must work with the state treasurer to record distributions from the stadium world cup capital account and calculate the repayment obligation for amounts expended. Loan terms shall include interest at a rate that is 0.5 percent higher than the interest rate that the account would have earned without the transfer, with funds to be repaid no later than September 30, 2026.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that loan funds be repaid from admissions taxes collected from World Cup events hosted at the stadium and deposited into the stadium and exhibition center account created in RCW 43.99N.060. If not earlier paid, on September 30, 2026, the director of the office of financial management shall direct the state treasurer to transfer any amounts due from the stadium and exhibition center account to the general fund.

[ 2024 c 168 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 168 ss 4-13: See note following RCW 41.05.155.